Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 80
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Records Retention Act", see article 17 of title 6.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

olorado Enacts Limited Liability

C

ompany Legislation", see 19 Colo. Law. 1029 (1990); for article, "Choice of Entities in Colorado", see 23 Colo. Law. 293 (1994); for article, "Colorado LLCs: New and Improved", see 24 Colo. Law. 1473 (1994); for article, "Classifying LLCs Under New IRS Ruling Guidelines", see 24 Colo. Law. 741 (1995); for article, "Choice of Entity in Colorado: An Update", see 25 Colo. Law. 3 (Oct. 1996); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Colorado LLCs as Nonprofit Organizations", see 27 Colo. Law. 57 (Aug. 1998); for article, "Contractually Binding Colorado Entities", see 28 Colo. Law. 33 (Dec. 1999); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article, "LLCs in Acquisitions: Increased Utility Under Recent Regulation", see 31 Colo. Law. 73 (Aug. 2002); for article, "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law. 6 (June 2004); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005); for article, "Satisfying Creditor Claims Against Colorado LLCs, Members, and Managers", see 36 Colo. Law. 23 (Jan. 2007); for article, "Piercing the Veil of an LLC or a Corporation", see 39 Colo. Law. 71 (Aug. 2010); for article, "Single-Member LLCs and Asset Protection", see 41 Colo. Law. 39 (March 2012).

Section

PART 1 DEFINITION AND APPLICATION

PART 2 FORMATION

PART 3 REGISTERED AGENTS,
SERVICE OF PROCESS,
AND ANNUAL REPORTS

PART 4 MANAGEMENT

PART 5 FINANCE

PART 6 DISTRIBUTIONS AND RESIGNATION

PART 7 MEMBERS

PART 8 DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 1 VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 2 ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 3 JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

PART 9 FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES

PART 10 MERGER AND CONVERSION

PART 11 APPLICABILITY OF ARTICLE